Louisiana, session 2026, HB722.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:414(F)(2) and 415(B)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§414. Suspension, revocation, renewal, and cancellation of licenses; judicial review
* * *
F.
* * *
(2)(a) For cause satisfactory to the department, it is hereby authorized to
suspend, cancel, or revoke the license of any person for a period of not more than
one year.
(b)(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person's
driver's license that has been suspended, cancelled, or revoked for nonpayment of
fees shall be automatically reinstated if both of the following occur:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 722 ENROLLED
(aa) The person makes full payment of all fees or fines assessed by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, that resulted
in the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of the driver's license.
(bb) The person provides proof of payment of any fees or fines, as
contemplated by R.S. 32:393, or any other provision under this Title.
(ii) The provisions of this Subparagraph do not apply to a person whose
driver's license has been suspended, cancelled, or revoked for operating a vehicle
while impaired pursuant to R.S. 14:98.
* * *
§415. Operating vehicle while license is suspended; offenses in other states; record
of offenses given other states
* * *
B.(1)(a) Any period of suspension or revocation shall automatically be
extended for a period of one year from the date the licensee would otherwise have
been entitled to apply for a new license upon his conviction for any offense involving
the operation of a motor vehicle committed during such period. No driver shall use
a license issued to him in another state or the privilege of a nonresident to drive a
motor vehicle in this state, upon receiving notice of his conviction, or of the entry of
a plea of guilty and sentence thereupon, or of the forfeiture of bail in another state
of federal jurisdiction for any offense, which if committed in this state, would be
grounds for suspension or revocation of the license.
(b)(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person's
driver's license that has been suspended, cancelled, or revoked for nonpayment of
fees shall be automatically reinstated if both of the following occur:
(aa) The person makes full payment of all fees or fines assessed by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, that resulted
in the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of the driver's license.
(bb) The person provides proof of payment of any fees or fines, as
contemplated by R.S. 32:393, or any other provision under this Title.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 722 ENROLLED
(ii) The provisions of this Subparagraph do not apply to a person whose
driver's license has been suspended, cancelled, or revoked for operating a vehicle
while impaired pursuant to R.S. 14:98.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.